en: Post Cards
xx: Post Cards
cs: Pohlednice
da: Postkort
de: Postkarten
es: Postales
fr: Cartes postales
it: Cartoline
ja: はがき・ポストカード
nl: Briefkaarten
no: Postkort
pl: Pocztówki
pt: Cartões-postais
ru: Почтовые открытки
sv: Vykort
tr: Kartpostallar

en: Printer & Copier Paper
xx: Printer & Copier Paper
cs: Papír do tiskáren a kopírek
da: Printer- og kopipapir
de: Drucker- & Kopierpapier
es: Papel para impresora y para copiadora
fr: Papier imprimante et photocopieur
it: Carta stampanti e fotocopiatrici
ja: プリンター・コピー用紙
nl: Papier voor printers en kopieerapparaten
no: Skriver- og kopipapir
pl: Papier ksero
pt: Papel para impressora e copiadora
ru: Бумага для принтеров и копировальной техники
sv: Skrivarpapper och kopieringspapper
tr: Yazıcı ve Fotokopi Kağıdı

en: Receipt & Adding Machine Paper Rolls
xx: Receipt & Adding Machine Paper Rolls
cs: Kotoučky do pokladen a kalkulaček
da: Papirruller til kvitteringer
de: Kassenrollen
es: Rollos de papel de recibo
fr: Rouleaux de papier pour tickets de caisse
it: Rulli di carta per registratori di cassa e calcolatrici
ja: レシートロール紙
nl: Kassabon- en telmachinerollen
no: Papirruller til kvitterings- og regnemaskiner
pl: Rolki do kas fiskalnych
pt: Bobinas de papel de recibos
ru: Бумага для чеков и счётных машин в рулонах
sv: Kvittopappersrullar
tr: Yazarkasa Ruloları

en: Stationery
xx: Stationery
cs: Papírnictví
da: Brevpapir
de: Briefpapier
es: Artículos de escritorio
fr: Papier à lettres
it: Carta da lettere
ja: 便箋
nl: Briefpapier
no: Brevpapir
pl: Papiery listowe
pt: Papelaria
ru: Почтовая бумага
sv: Brevpapper
tr: Kırtasiye Malzemeleri

en: Sticky Notes
xx: Sticky Notes
cs: Lepicí poznámky
da: Post-its
de: Haftnotizen
es: Notas adhesivas
fr: Notes autocollantes
it: Biglietti adesivi
ja: 付箋
nl: Memobriefjes
no: Selvklebende notatlapper
pl: Karteczki samoprzylepne
pt: Notas adesivas
ru: Стикеры
sv: Post-it-lappar
tr: Yapışkanlı Not Kağıtları

en: Rubber bands
xx: Rubber bands
cs: Gumičky
da: Elastikker
de: Gummibänder
es: Gomas elásticas
fr: Élastiques
it: Elastici
ja: 輪ゴム
nl: Elastieken
no: Strikk
pl: Gumki recepturki
pt: Elásticos
ru: Канцелярские резинки
sv: Gummisnoddar, Gummiband
tr: Paket Lastikleri

en: Staples
xx: Staples
ar: دبوس مزدوج السن
ca: Grapa
ce: Атлан
cs: Spony do sešívaček
cv: Такар
cy: Stwffwl
da: Hæfteklammer
de: Heftklammern
eo: Krampoj
es: Grapas
et: Aas
eu: Grapa
fa: سوزن منگنه
fi: Niitti
fr: Agrafes
gl: Grampa
hu: Tűzőkapocs
id: Kokot
it: Graffette, Agrafes
ja: ホッチキス針, ステープル
ko: 스테이플
la: Uncinulus
ms: Dawai kokot
nb: Heftestifter, Stifter
nl: Nietjes
pl: Zszywki, Zszywka
pt: Agrafos, Grampos
ro: Scoabă
ru: Скобы для степлеров, Скоба
sl: Sponka
su: Eusi hékter
sv: Häftklamrar, Häftklammer
tr: Zımba Telleri, Zımba
uk: Скоба
vi: Đinh kẹp
yi: דרעטל
zh: 订书钉, 鋦釘, 訂書釘

en: Tacks & Pushpins
xx: Tacks & Pushpins
cs: Cvočky a připínáčky
da: Stifter og nipsenåle
de: Reißzwecken & Pins
es: Chinchetas y tachuelas
fr: Punaises et épingles de fixation
it: Puntine da disegno
ja: 画鋲・押しピン
nl: Punaises en pushpins
no: Tegnestifter og markørnåler
pl: Pinezki z łbem plastikowym
pt: Tachinhas e alfinetes
ru: Кнопки и булавки
sv: Häftstift och nålar
tr: Düğme Raptiyeler ve Raptiyeler

en: Impulse Sealers
xx: Impulse Sealers
cs: Svářečky igelitových sáčků
da: Forseglingsmaskiner
de: Impulsschweißgeräte
es: Selladoras de impulso
fr: Soudeuses à impulsion
it: Sigillatrici a impulsi
ja: インパルスシーラー
nl: Impulssealers
no: Varmeforseglere
pl: Zgrzewarki do folii
pt: Seladores de impulso
ru: Машины для импульсной сварки
sv: Värmeförseglare
tr: Poşet Ağzı Kapatma Makineleri

en: Lap Desks
xx: Lap Desks
cs: Podložky k notebookům a na psaní
da: Laptopbord
de: Laptophalter
es: Escritorios portátiles
fr: Supports pour ordinateurs portables
it: Scrittoio da tavolo
ja: ラップデスク
nl: Schootbureaus
no: PC-underlag
pl: Przenośne biurka
pt: Mesas de colo
ru: Наколенные столики
sv: Knäskrivbord
tr: Laptop Minderleri

en: Name Plates
xx: Name Plates
cs: Jmenovky
da: Navneskilte
de: Namensschilder
es: Placas de nombre
fr: Plaques nominatives
it: Targhette portanome
ja: ネームプレート
nl: Naamplaatjes
no: Navneskilt
pl: Tabliczki z nazwiskiem
pt: Placas para nomes
ru: Именные таблички
sv: Namnskyltar
tr: İsim Plakaları

en: Office & Chair Mats
xx: Office & Chair Mats
cs: Podložky do kanceláře a pod židli
da: Kontormåtter og stoleunderlag
de: Büromatten & Stuhlunterlagen
es: Alfombrillas para sillas y oficinas
fr: Tapis et protections de sol pour bureaux
it: Tappetini per uffici e sedie
ja: オフィスマット・チェアマット
nl: Kantoor- en stoelmatten
no: Kontor- og stolmatter
pl: Maty biurowe
pt: Tapetes de escritório e cadeira
ru: Офисные коврики
sv: Kontorsmattor och golvskydd
tr: Ofis ve Sandalye Minderleri

en: Anti-Fatigue Mats
xx: Anti-Fatigue Mats
cs: Podložky proti únavě
da: Hvilemåtter
de: Arbeitsplatzmatten
es: Alfombras antifatiga
fr: Tapis antifatigue
it: Tappetini antifatica
ja: 疲労軽減マット
nl: Antivermoeidheidsmatten
no: Ergonomimatter
pl: Maty antypoślizgowe
pt: Tapetes antifadiga
ru: Коврики против усталости
sv: Arbetsplatsmattor
tr: Yorgunluk Giderici Minderler

en: Chair Mats
xx: Chair Mats
cs: Podložky pod židli
da: Stoleunderlag
de: Stuhlunterlagen
es: Alfombrillas para sillas
fr: Protections de sol pour bureaux
it: Tappetini per sedie
ja: チェアマット
nl: Stoelmatten
no: Stolmatter
pl: Maty ochronne pod krzesła obrotowe
pt: Tapetes para cadeira
ru: Коврики для кресел
sv: Golvskydd
tr: Sandalye Minderleri

en: Office Mats
xx: Office Mats
cs: Podložky do kanceláře
da: Kontormåtter
de: Büromatten
es: Alfombrillas para oficinas
fr: Tapis de bureau
it: Tappetini per uffici
ja: オフィスマット
nl: Kantoormatten
no: Kontormatter
pl: Maty wejściowe
pt: Tapetes de escritório
ru: Коврики для офисов
sv: Kontorsmattor
tr: Ofis Minderleri

en: Office Carts
xx: Office Carts
cs: Kancelářské vozíky
da: Kontorvogne
de: Bürowagen
es: Carritos de oficina
fr: Chariots de bureau
it: Carrelli per uffici
ja: オフィスワゴン
nl: Kantoorkarren
no: Kontorvogner
pl: Wózki biurowe
pt: Carrinhos de escritório
ru: Офисные тележки
sv: Kontorsvagnar
tr: Ofis Arabaları

en: AV Carts
xx: AV Carts
cs: Vozíky na AV techniku
da: Av-vogne
de: Medienwagen
es: Carritos para equipos audiovisuales
fr: Meubles audio/vidéo à roulettes
it: Carrelli audio e video
ja: AVワゴン
nl: Audio- en videokarren
no: AV-vogner
pl: Szafki na sprzęt RTV
pt: Carrinhos para equipamentos de áudio e vídeo
ru: Стойки для аудио- и видеооборудования
sv: AV-vagnar
tr: Görsel İşitsel Cihaz Arabaları

en: Book Carts
xx: Book Carts
cs: Vozíky na knihy
da: Bogvogne
de: Bücherwagen
es: Carritos de libros
fr: Chariots pour livres
it: Carrelli per libri
ja: ブックワゴン
nl: Boekenkarren
no: Bokvogner
pl: Wózki biblioteczne
pt: Carrinhos de livros
ru: Тележки для книг
sv: Bokvagnar
tr: Tekerlekli Kitaplıklar

en: File Carts
xx: File Carts
cs: Vozíky na pořadače
da: Arkivvogne
de: Aktenwagen
es: Carritos archivadores
fr: Classeurs-chariots
it: Carrelli per archivi
ja: ファイルワゴン
nl: Archiefkarren
no: Arkivvogner
pl: Wózki do dokumentów
pt: Carrinhos de arquivos
ru: Тележки для документов
sv: Hängmappsvagnar
tr: Dosya Arabaları

en: Mail Carts
xx: Mail Carts
cs: Vozíky na poštu
da: Postvogne
de: Postwagen
es: Carritos de correo
fr: Chariots pour courrier
it: Carrelli per la posta
ja: メールワゴン
nl: Postkarren
no: Postvogner
pl: Wózki pocztowe
pt: Carrinhos de correio
ru: Почтовые тележки
sv: Postvagnar
tr: Posta Taşıma Arabaları